Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-110
Buffalo.

The county of Buffalo is bounded as follows: Commencing at a point where the dividing line between ranges twelve and thirteen crosses the southern channel of the Platte River; thence up said channel to a point where the dividing line between ranges eighteen and nineteen intersects the same; thence north along said line to the third standard parallel; thence east along said parallel to the northeast corner of township twelve, north, of range thirteen, west; thence south to the place of beginning.

G.S.1873, c. 12, § 7, p. 213;

R.S.1913, § 823;

C.S.1922, § 725;

C.S.1929, § 25-112;

R.S.1943, § 22-110.